Washington statutes.
RCW 2.50.140

Washington State Bar Association not restricted.

No county funds shall be expended for legal aid except in accordance with this chapter, but nothing in this chapter shall limit the powers of the Washington State Bar Association, or its board of governors, to promote or render legal aid independent of county financial support.

[ 1939 c 93 s 14; RRS s 10007-214. Formerly RCW 74.36.140.]